Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.020

Power to invest funds—Restrictions.

A mutual savings bank shall have the power to invest its funds in the manner set forth in chapter 32.08 RCW and in this chapter and not otherwise.

[ 1999 c 14 s 25; 1955 c 13 s 32.20.020. Prior: 1929 c 74 s 2; RRS s 3381-2.]